Utah statutes.
59-14-203.   Failure to obtain a license -- Penalty.

Any person engaging in the business of manufacturing, importing, distributing, or selling or offering to sell cigarettes without holding a valid license that is currently not suspended or revoked is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for each offense.



Amended by Chapter 217, 2004 General Session

